Washington statutes.
RCW 17.10.140

Owner's duty to control spread of noxious weeds.

(1) Except as is provided under subsection (2) of this section, every owner must perform or cause to be performed those acts as may be necessary to:

(a) Eradicate all class A noxious weeds;

(b) Control and prevent the spread of all class B noxious weeds designated for control in that region within and from the owner's property; and

(c) Control and prevent the spread of all class B and class C noxious weeds listed on the county weed list as locally mandated control priorities within and from the owner's property.

(2) Every owner of forestlands classified under RCW 17.10.240(2), or meeting the definition of forestlands contained in RCW 17.10.240, must perform or cause to be performed those acts as may be necessary to:

(a) Eradicate all class A noxious weeds;

(b) Control and prevent the spread of all class B noxious weeds designated for control in that region within and from the owner's property; and

(c) Control and prevent the spread of all class B and class C noxious weeds listed on the county weed list as locally mandated control priorities within and from the owner's property only when encountered in any of the following enumerated circumstances:

(i) Within 1,000 feet of adjacent land uses;

(ii) Within 25 feet of all privately owned roads unless properly abandoned as defined under WAC 222-24-052 as that section existed as of January 1, 2020;

(iii) Within 200 feet of navigable rivers, gravel pits, log yards, and staging areas, except when not allowed under other state or federal laws or regulations; and

(iv) For a single five-year period within harvested areas following the harvesting of trees for products.

[ 2021 c 217 s 8; 1997 c 353 s 17; 1969 ex.s. c 113 s 14.]